California statutes. Public Resources Code
(b) If the secretary finds that the time limits under appeal have been violated without good cause, the secretary shall establish a date certain by which the environmental agency shall act on the permit application with adequate provision for the requirements of subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 71022, and provide for the full reimbursement of any filing or permit processing fees paid by the applicant to the environmental agency for the permit application under appeal. For purposes of this section, “good cause” shall have the same meaning as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 15376 of the Government Code.

(c) The determination of the secretary on an appeal shall be based only on procedural violations, including, but not limited to, the exceeding of time limits, not on any nonprocedural matter with regard to the environmental permit application or the environmental permit.

(d) In cases of a violation of time limits set pursuant to Section 71022, the determination of the secretary to order a reimbursement of any application filing fee pursuant to the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall only be applicable to the consolidated permit agency or to the participating permit agencies that are in violation of the time limits without showing good cause.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an appeal pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be only for violations of the time limits established pursuant to Section 71022 for those environmental agencies described in subdivisions (c) and (h) of Section 71011.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 405, Sec. 72.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

71031.

(a) Each state environmental agency, as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 71011, in consultation and coordination with all interested parties, may adopt a process to precertify equipment and processes as being in compliance with any laws and regulations applicable to the state environmental agency. The secretary shall ensure that, to the extent one or more state environmental agencies adopt regulations pursuant to this section, the regulations are standardized and coordinated in the most efficient and effective manner feasible.

(b) If a state environmental agency adopts regulations pursuant to subdivision (a), it shall, to the extent feasible and appropriate, adopt standardized permits to incorporate equipment and processes precertified pursuant to subdivision (a). Where applicable, the state environmental agencies shall include, as part of their precertification, a model standardized permit ordinance that local environmental agencies may adopt.

(c) Local environmental agencies, as defined in subdivisions (c) to (h), inclusive, of Section 71011, may adopt standardized permits to incorporate equipment and processes precertified pursuant to subdivision (a). Nothing in this section shall limit the ability of a local environmental agency to adopt additional requirements as part of the standardized permit to meet local health and safety concerns.

(d) For purposes of this section, a “standardized permit” means a permit for pollution sources or activities that are the same or similar in their nature, and which require the submission of the same or similar information for purposes of issuing, monitoring, and enforcing permit requirements.

(e) Nothing in this section shall result in the reduction or elimination of environmental or public health protection or public participation, as provided under all applicable laws, in the issuance of any permit authorized by this section.

(f) Any environmental agency may charge a reasonable fee for costs incurred pursuant to this section, not to exceed estimated reasonable costs. Any fee shall be subject to Section 57001 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 367, Sec. 2.   Effective August 19, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 1.5. PERMIT ASSISTANCE CENTERS [71040. - 71041.]

71040.

The Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development shall establish an electronic online permit assistance center through the Internet. The electronic online permit assistance center shall be available for use by any business or other entity subject to a law or regulation implemented by an agency, authority, bureau, board, commission, conservancy, council, department, state district, or office, and shall provide a business or other entity with assistance in complying with those laws and regulations. The center, which shall be called the “California Government-On Line to Desktops” or “CALGOLD” program, shall provide special software, “hotlinks,” and other online resources and tools that may be used by a business or
 other entity to streamline and expedite compliance with laws and regulations implemented by an agency, authority, bureau, board, commission, conservancy, council, department, state district, or office. The CALGOLD program shall, to the extent feasible, incorporate permit assistance activities of local and federal entities and of other entities of the state into its operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 294, Sec. 13.   (AB 2012)   Effective September 11, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

71041.

The CALGOLD program shall be reviewed periodically and, when necessary, updated to assist businesses in the state that would benefit from information on permitting and regulatory compliance, including emerging industries and life sciences industries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 283, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. ENVIRONMENTAL DATA REPORTING [71050. - 71082.]



  CHAPTER 1. Legislative Findings and Declarations [71050. - 71050.]

71050.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Environmental data is currently required by, and submitted to, a variety of public agencies with jurisdiction at the state, regional, and local levels of government. The same information is often submitted by the regulated community to different public agencies, almost always on one or more paper forms. Since a different format is now required for each such report, data items are required to be reformatted one or more additional times at a cost of time and money that brings no accompanying environmental benefit.

(b) The blizzard of incoming paper reports often exceeds the capacity of a public agency to digest the information. In some cases, the public agency cannot look at or evaluate all of the data received on paper. That problem of data utility is aggravated further by the current wasteful and error-laden practice of retyping data from paper forms into the public agency’s computer data base.

(c) In many cases, reported data originates in a computer data base maintained by the company submitting the report. The retyping of data by the public agency could be completely eliminated if business entities were permitted to submit the data in a single electronic format which every public agency could then use. That standard approach would permit both business entities and public agencies to save time and money that is now spent in reformatting, reentering, and reediting data. The data would also be available more quickly to any member of the public interested in using the data.

(d) Business entities already use common, standardized electronic data formats and protocols to exchange commercial and technical information on materials to be transported and used in manufacturing. That application of electronic data interchange is an important factor in determining the competitiveness of business entities in this state. The imposition by government of barriers to, or multiple incompatible data format requirements on, those existing electronic interchanges impairs the competitiveness of business entities without bringing any accompanying environmental benefit.

(e) It is the policy of the state, for environmental and hazardous materials reporting purposes, to employ nonproprietary electronic data formats and transmission protocols that already function effectively for ongoing commercial and industrial data exchanges between business entities and across different computer operating systems instead of expending public funds to develop public agency-specific formats and protocols.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1112, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [71053. - 71055.]

71053.

“Advisory committee” means the Environmental Data Management Advisory Committee established pursuant to Section 71064.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1112, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

71054.

“Agency” means the California Environmental Protection Agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1112, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

71055.

“Secretary” means the Secretary for Environmental Protection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1112, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Data Management [71060. - 71068.]

71060.

The secretary shall develop and adopt information technology standards by which public agencies and regulated business entities and the other members of the regulated community may use computers and other information technology to specify, request, report, collect, communicate, process, display, disseminate, or otherwise utilize data for environmental data reporting requirements that are imposed in the course of granting permits or other authorizations to operate issued pursuant to specified provisions of state and federal law and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1112, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

71061.

The secretary shall establish a standardized electronic format and protocol for the exchange of electronic data for the purpose of meeting environmental data reporting or other usage requirements that are imposed pursuant to all of the following laws and regulations adopted pursuant to those laws:

(a) Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100), including, but not limited to, Article 6 (commencing with Section 25160), Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 25280), and Chapter 6.95 (commencing with Section 25500) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Article 1 (commencing with Section 42300) of Chapter 4 of Part 4 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Water Code.

(d) The Solid Waste Disposal Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq.).

(e) The Emergency Planning and Community Right-to-Know Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11001 et seq.).

(f) Any other law relating to environmental protection, including, but not limited to, hazardous waste, substances, and materials, as determined by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 880, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71062.

The secretary shall identify the environmental data reporting or usage requirements imposed pursuant to the laws listed in Section 71061 and reflect those requirements in the elements of the standardized electronic format and protocol, develop a data dictionary that describes the characteristics of each format element and its relationship to each environmental data reporting or usage requirement, and develop evaluation criteria by which the successful use of the standardized electronic format and protocol may be measured.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1112, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

71063.

(a) The proposed standardized electronic format and protocol required by Section 71061 and the alternative signature techniques required by Section 71066 shall be tested in the Counties of Santa Clara and San Mateo as a pilot program, for a period determined by the secretary, and at the initiative of business entity report submitters who have organized to implement electronic data interchange among themselves for other business purposes and who wish to employ the same technology for exchanging environmental data. Any of the participating business entities located within those counties who are required to comply with the environmental data reporting requirements imposed pursuant to the laws listed in Section 71061, may comply by submitting the data in the prescribed standardized electronic format.

(b) The secretary shall meet the requirements of Section 71063 using resources contributed exclusively by business participants. The secretary may accept and use computer hardware, software, and support services furnished by the industry or business participants at their own cost in order for the agency to participate in the pilot program. No public funds shall be encumbered in order to conduct, or pay for, any part of the pilot program originally undertaken or provided by any business participant. The brands of products employed shall not be identified in public, nor shall their use be deemed an endorsement of any particular brand or proprietary approach to electronic data interchange.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1112, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

71064.

(a) There is in the agency the Environmental Data Management Advisory Committee. The advisory committee shall consist of not more than seven members appointed by the secretary. The secretary shall select members who represent business, government, and environmental groups, and who have proven expertise and current knowledge in the field of electronic data exchange.

(b) The advisory committee shall advise the secretary on the quickest, most effective, and least expensive alternative systems of electronic standards for formatting data.

(c) The meetings of the advisory committee shall be open to the public and shall provide an opportunity for the public to be heard on matters considered by the advisory committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 173.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

71065.

To the fullest extent practicable to public agencies and business entities, the secretary, in close consultation with the advisory committee, shall ensure that the standardized electronic format and protocol established pursuant to Section 71061 meets all of the following criteria:

(a) The format and protocol conforms with, or is compatible with, data interchange formats and protocols already in use in the regulated community for moving data from computer to computer, so that the format and pilot program may be implemented promptly, without the need for research and development into untried formats and protocols.

(b) The format and protocol works independently of the type of computer hardware, software, operating system, data storage device, and telecommunications equipment employed by prospective senders and receivers.

(c) The format and protocol accommodates the addition of new or revised data element specifications without requiring users to make costly modifications to the hardware or software that they employ to submit electronic data.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1112, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

71066.

The secretary shall prescribe one or more techniques by which a report may be signed electronically by a person who would otherwise place a written signature on a paper version of the report. The prescribed electronic signature shall be binding on all persons and for all purposes under the law as if the signature had been made in ink on the equivalent paper document. The secretary may also prescribe a paper form for signature and certification of a report submitted in the prescribed file format on tangible magnetic media, including, but not limited to, floppy disks or magnetic tape.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1112, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

71067.

Public agencies shall continue their current data auditing practices, and shall work with data submitters to correct all kinds of data error encountered. The pilot program shall require that each participant maintain an audit trail as part of the evaluation criteria so that inspectors and other evaluators may ensure that the data submitted comport with the data received along the electronic link.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1112, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

71068.

(a) Upon the completion of a demonstration of any standardized electronic format and protocol and alternative signature technique pursuant to this part, to the satisfaction of the advisory committee, the secretary shall adopt that electronic format and protocol standard for use as an optional alternative to submitting environmental data on paper to any state or local agency.

(b) Any local agency requiring the submission of an element of environmental data not found in the data dictionary maintained by the secretary pursuant to Section 71062 may petition the secretary for inclusion of that data element. The secretary shall include an additional data item in the data dictionary only if the local agency demonstrates both of the following:

(1) One of the following applies:

(A) A specific requirement for that item in existing law or regulation.

(B) A principle of mathematics or science that requires the collection of that data item to meet another specific purpose under the applicable law.

(2) There is no other way to meet the local agency’s needs using combinations of data elements already incorporated into the data dictionary.

(c) The electronic submission of environmental data to any state or local agency in accordance with the data standards adopted under this part constitutes compliance with the environmental data reporting or other usage requirements imposed pursuant to the laws specified in subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, of Section 71061, and has the same force and effect as if the data had been submitted in ink on paper.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person or state or local agency shall be required to submit or receive environmental data electronically, but every state or local agency that elects to engage in electronic data management with regard to environmental data shall employ the electronic reporting standards adopted by the secretary under this part.

(e) Nothing in this section limits any existing authority of a local agency to require the submission of environmental data.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 962, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Report and Information Management [71069. - 71074.]

71069.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) It is the policy of the state to conserve and protect its natural resources.

(b) Over 1,400 reports are submitted annually to the Legislature and the Governor, costing up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per report for printing and distribution.

(c) The California Environmental Protection Agency has historically submitted over 60 reports annually to the Legislature and the Governor. The agency’s boards, departments, and offices submit over 300 additional reports and studies, not including the hundreds of guidance documents, fact sheets and other printed materials produced.

(d) Submitting reports to the Legislature and Governor electronically, by compact disc, and posting the reports on state agency Web sites would greatly improve economic efficiency and environmental sustainability through minimized consumption of paper and printing materials, while reducing the economic and environmental costs associated with the production, distribution, and storage of printed reports.

(e) Access to the World Wide Web is continually expanding for the private sector and the general public. Providing reports electronically on state agency Web sites would grant greater accessibility to these reports and allow for greater sharing of knowledge and data with Californians and other information seekers. In some instances, a printed copy of a report is necessary. In those instances, economic efficiency and environmental sustainability can still be realized through various resource conservation efforts.

(f) Current law mandates state agencies to purchase recycled content products and materials, including printing and writing paper. There are also proven techniques and materials that are environmentally and economically preferable, and are widely available for use of all document production.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 644, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

71069.5.

For purposes of this chapter “board” means the California Integrated Waste Management Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 644, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

71070.

(a) On or before January 1, 2005, the board, in consultation with the state agencies affected by the changes made by the act of the 2003–04 Regular Session of the Legislature adding this chapter, shall develop and implement guidelines, to provide and produce reports and other documentation, including guidance documents, fact sheets, and other publications and written materials, in the most efficient and environmentally sustainable manner possible.

(b) The guidelines shall include all of the following:

(1) Distribution of reports and other documentation by electronic means and compact discs.

(2) Information on posting reports and other documentation on state agency Web sites.

(3) Techniques for the production of reports and other documentation that will reduce waste and encourage the use of recycled goods, materials, and supplies.

(4) The cost reduction options specified in Section 7550.1 of the Government Code.

(5) Distribution of a reasonable number of printed reports to ensure public access.

(c) On or before February 1, 2005, the board shall distribute the guidelines to each state agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 644, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

71071.

(a) On and after February 1, 2005, the California Environmental Protection Agency and its boards, departments, and offices shall provide and produce reports and other documentation pursuant to the guidelines established in Section 71070.

(b) On and after June 1, 2005, all state agencies not otherwise subject to subdivision (a) shall provide and produce reports and other documentation pursuant to the guidelines established in Section 71070.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 644, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

71073.

On or before April 30, 2005, each state agency shall conduct a thorough review of each report that the state agency is required to submit to the Legislature. During this review, the state agency shall identify whether the report is a completed one-time report, an obsolete report, or a duplicative report that can be eliminated or modified.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 644, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

71074.

Any reporting requirements imposed by this chapter do not supersede a reporting requirement in any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 644, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Environmental Protection Indicators for California [71080. - 71082.]

71080.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) Traditionally, many of California’s environmental programs have assessed their performance using measures of activity, including, for example, the number of permits granted or regulatory standards adopted. Addressing the complex environmental challenges of the 21st century will require new approaches that rely on better information from objective and scientifically based environmental indicators. Over the years, substantial efforts have been devoted toward this end, yet historically there have been very few meaningful, objective measures with which to determine the environmental impacts of these efforts.

(b) The California Environmental Protection Agency has made a commitment to move away from measures of activity, and instead focus on measurable environmental results to judge program performance. To support this commitment, the California Environmental Protection Agency established the Environmental Protection Indicators for California (EPIC) Project in 2000, and charged EPIC with developing and maintaining a comprehensive set of environmental indicators, which are scientific measurements of environmental conditions and trends. To ensure that the development of indicators was based on sound science, the California Environmental Protection Agency designated its Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment to lead the effort. The California Environmental Protection Agency, working in partnership with the Resources Agency and in cooperation with the Department of Health Services, released a report containing the initial set of 84 environmental indicators in April 2002.

(c) Objective and scientifically based environmental indicators improve our understanding of the environment and how human activities and other factors can influence it. The indicators establish a scientific basis for evaluating the effectiveness of environmental programs and identifying the need for specific actions to improve environmental conditions throughout the state and the disproportionate impact on low-income communities and communities of color. Decisions to create, modify, or eliminate California Environmental Protection Agency policies and programs need to be driven by information reflected by environmental indicators; and, to the extent feasible, budget decisions should include a reference as to how the proposed change is intended to impact a relevant environmental indicator.

(d) To ensure the credibility of objective and scientifically based environmental indicators, a qualified scientific body with expertise in environmental and public health protection should provide input into the selection and development of the indicators. 

(e) To ensure the relevance of the environmental indicators, input should be sought from a broad range of stakeholders.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Secretary for Environmental Protection, the Secretary of the Resources Agency, and the Director of the Department of Health Services in conjunction with the boards, departments, and offices in their respective agencies, use environmental indicators, where applicable, in the development of the budget proposals for the 2005–06 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 664, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

71081.

(a) Beginning on July 1, 2004, to the extent that funds are appropriated by the Legislature for this purpose, the office, on behalf of the office of the secretary, shall develop and maintain a system of environmental indicators. The office shall develop and maintain the system to meet all of the following objectives for using environmental indicators:

(1) Provide policymakers and the public with an improved understanding of the condition of the state’s environment and the effects of the release of contaminants on public health and the environment.

(2) Provide policymakers and the public with information to evaluate the effectiveness of the agency’s programs in improving environmental quality and protecting public health throughout the state, including environmental quality and public health in low-income communities and communities of color.

(3) Assist in the development and modification of agency programs, plans, and policies as environmental conditions change over time.

(4) Assist the agency in making budget decisions that address the most significant environmental concerns.

(b) The following definitions apply to this section:

(1) “Agency” means the California Environmental Protection Agency.

(2) “Environmental indicator” means an objective and scientifically based measure that represents information on environmental conditions, releases of contaminants into the environment, or the effects of those releases.

(3) “Office” means the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment.

(4) “Secretary” means the Secretary for Environmental Protection.

(c) The secretary shall submit a report on the environmental indicators developed pursuant to this chapter to the Governor and the Legislature on or before January 1, 2006, and by January 1 every two years thereafter. The report shall include a discussion as to the manner in which the environmental indicators are being used by the agency to meet the objectives set forth in subdivision (a). The office shall make the report available to the public on its Internet Web site. The office shall include on its Internet Web site any additional relevant information in support of those environmental indicators and shall update that information posted on the Internet Web site as new information becomes available.

(d) The office shall be the lead agency for developing new environmental indicators, for modifying, deleting, and updating existing environmental indicators, and for developing and maintaining an environmental indicator database. The office shall lead an intra-agency workgroup, consisting of representatives from each of the boards, departments, and offices within the agency. The office shall consult with the intra-agency workgroup in developing and maintaining the environmental indicators, program planning, policy formulation, and other decisionmaking processes, and in drafting the report required under subdivision (c).

(e) In developing and maintaining the environmental indicators, the office shall consult with the Resources Agency, the State Department of Health Services, and other state agencies as appropriate.

(f) The office may utilize information for indicators that is not collected by other boards and departments within the agency and may identify and establish new indicators.

(g) In implementing this section, the office may hold public meetings to receive comments from a broad range of stakeholders, including, but not limited to, local government, the regulated community, nongovernmental organizations, and other groups with an interest in environmental issues.

(h) The office shall consult with the scientific review panel established pursuant to Section 50.8 of the Labor Code for the purpose of establishing, updating, and evaluating environmental indicators.

(i) The secretary shall periodically assess the ability of the environmental indicators system to meet each of the objectives cited in subdivision (a) and the ability of the system to support the development and implementation of the agencywide environmental justice strategy pursuant to Section 71113.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 606.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

71082.

(a) As appropriate, a budget change proposal submitted to the Legislature by a board, department, or office within the California Environmental Protection Agency or the Resources Agency shall describe how the proposal would affect any applicable “Type I” environmental indicator. To the extent that a budget change proposal relates to a “Type II” or “Type III” environmental indicator, the budget change proposal shall reference what data collection and further analysis is needed before the environmental status or trend that is the subject of the indicator may be presented.

(b) A board, department, or office within the California Environmental Protection Agency shall explain how its bond programs relate to or affect environmental indicators.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 664, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.1. California Communities Environmental Health Screening [71090. - 71090.]

71090.

(a) For purposes of this part, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Office” means the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment.

(2) “Tool” means the California Communities Environmental Health Screening, also known as CalEnviroScreen, that is used to identify disadvantaged communities pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) (1) In the next update of the tool or by January 1, 2017, whichever is sooner, the office shall report to the Legislature on air quality, water quality, and
 toxic release and hazardous waste site data necessary for updating the indicators in the tool for communities located in the California-Mexico border region, including both of the following:

(A) Deficiencies in and barriers to accessing necessary data.

(B) Current and future monitoring studies and plans for obtaining the data.

(2) A report submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(c) For the purposes of subdivision (b), necessary data and information may include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(1) Air quality
 measurements for ozone and particulate matter 2.5 microns and smaller in size in the border region.

(2) Vehicle emissions at border crossings.

(3) Complete traffic density data within 150 meters of the border.

(4) Water quality data for waterways that cross the border.

(5) Feasibility of incorporating into the tool information from Mexico contained in the Pollutant Release and Transfer Registry.

(d) When such data
 of sufficient quality identified in subdivisions (b) and (c) are available for the communities in the California-Mexico border region, the office shall include that data in the next update of the tool.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 584, Sec. 1.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.5. ENVIRONMENTAL AND PUBLIC HEALTH PROTECTION AT THE CALIFORNIA-MEXICO BORDER [71100. - 71104.]

71100.

The following definitions govern the construction of this part: 

(a) “California-Baja California border region” means the region to the north and south of the international border between California and Baja California described in Article 4 of the La Paz Agreement, signed August 14, 1983, between the United States and Mexico.

(b) “Council” means the California-Mexico Border Relations Council, established pursuant to Section 99522 of the Government Code.

(c) “Fund” means the California Border Environmental and Public Health Protection
 Fund established pursuant to Section 71101.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 668, Sec. 4.   (AB 965)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Provisions applicable as prescribed in Section 71104.)
-------------------------------------------

71101.

(a) The California Border Environmental and Public Health Protection Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury to receive funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act, including, but not limited to, proceeds of bonds sold pursuant to Division 26.7 (commencing with Section 79700) of the Water Code, and other sources, such as from the North American Development Bank, Border Environment Cooperation Committee, United States Environmental Protection Agency, and private businesses or foundations, and any interest accrued on those funds.

(b) The money in the fund shall be available, upon appropriation, to the
 California-Mexico Border Relations Council pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 99520) of Title 20 of the Government Code, for expenditure for the purposes of this part.

(c) The money in the fund shall not be made available for the purpose of bringing a person or a facility into compliance with environmental laws, or to provide funds to remediate environmental damage. The fund, instead, shall assist appropriate responsible agencies in California and Baja California in the implementation of projects to identify and resolve environmental and public health problems that directly threaten the health or environmental quality of California residents or sensitive natural resources of the California border region, including projects related to domestic and industrial wastewater, vehicle and industrial air emissions, hazardous
 waste transport and disposal, human and ecological risk, and disposal of municipal solid waste.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 668, Sec. 5.   (AB 965)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Provisions applicable as prescribed in Section 71104.)
-------------------------------------------

71102.

The money in the fund shall be used for the following purposes: (a) To assist local governments in implementation of projects to identify and resolve environmental and public health problems that directly threaten the health or environmental quality of California residents or sensitive natural resources of the California border region, including projects related to domestic and industrial wastewater, vehicle and industrial air emissions, hazardous waste transport and disposal, human and ecological risks, and disposal of municipal solid waste.

(b) To provide technical assistance to those persons and entities described in subdivision (a) with regard to environmental protection, public health protection, or natural resource protection.

(c) To provide limited funds for equipment and labor costs associated with emergency abatement of environmental and public health problems imposed on residents of California due to cross-border impacts of pollutants originating from Baja California.

(d) To provide analytical and scientific equipment and services needed by border area public agencies to identify and monitor the sources of environmental and public health threats posed by cross-border transmission of environmental pollutants and toxics.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 742, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Provisions applicable as prescribed in Section 71104.)
-------------------------------------------

71103.

(a) The California-Mexico Border Relations Council, upon request, shall inform any community-based nonprofit environmental organization, responsible local government, and special district located within the California-Baja California border region that it may request funding pursuant to Section 71102.

(b) The
 California-Mexico Border Relations Council, shall award grants to a local governmental entity or special district, community-based nonprofit environmental organization, or postsecondary educational institution based on the severity of the environmental, public health, or natural resource concerns due to cross-border transmission of environmental pollutants or toxics to the city or county in which the entity, organization, or institution is located. First priority for funding shall be given to an entity, organization, or institution located in a city or county in which an environmental, public health, or natural resource threat exists and that has existing capability to respond to, implement, and abate the threat to California from cross-border sources.

(c) The Secretary for Environmental Protection, on behalf of the council,